Maryland, session 2026, SB0618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
5–514.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0618*

SENATE BILL 618
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection, a member
of the General Assembly, a filed candidate for election to the General Assembly, or a
member–elect of the General Assembly may not receive earned income from:
(i) an executive unit; or
(ii) a political subdivision of the State.
(2) The Joint Ethics Committee may exempt an individual from the
provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection if:
(I) the earned income is for:
(i) 1. educational instruction provided by the member,
candidate, or member–elect;
(ii) 2. a position that is subject to a merit system hiring process;
(iii) 3. a human services position; or
(iv) 4. a career promotion, change, or progression that is a logical
transition from a pre–existing relationship as described in paragraph (3)(ii) of this
subsection; OR
5. IF THE INDIVIDUAL HAS SERVED AT LEAST ONE FULL
TERM IN THE MARYLAND GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR ON THE GOVERNING BODY OF A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, A POSITION FOR WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL
OBJECTIVELY SATISFIES THE MINIMUM EDUCATION, LICENSURE, AND EXPERIENCE
REQUIREMENTS; AND
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL COMPLIES WITH § 5–506 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) This subsection does not apply to compensation to a member, candidate,
or member–elect derived from:
(i) employment as a nonelected law enforcement officer or a fire or
rescue squad worker; [or]
(ii) a transaction or relationship that existed before the individual:
1. filed a certificate of candidacy for election to the General
Assembly while the individual was not an incumbent member of the General Assembly; or
2. was appointed to fill a vacancy; OR

SENATE BILL 618 3
(III) A TRANSACTION OR RELATIONSHIP:
1. THAT THE INDIVIDUAL ENTERED INTO AFTER HAVING
SERVED AT LEAST ONE FULL ELECTED TERM IN THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
2. FOR WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL HAS OBJECTIVELY
SATISFIED THE MINIMUM EDUCATION, LICENSURE, AND EXPERIENCE
REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Joint Committee on
Legislative Ethics shall issue an opinion to provide guidance to the members of the
Maryland General Assembly on compliance with this Act, including:
(1) necessary actions that a member should take to avoid a conflict of
interest; and
(2) factors that the Committee will consider when determining whether to
grant an exemption under § 5–514(a)(2) of the General Provisions Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026 January 13, 2027.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.